Colorado, session 2026A, HB1402.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-302, amend
(2)(uu), (2)(vv), (2.3)(p), (2.3)(q), (2.5)(s), and (2.5)(t); and add (2)(ww),
(2.3)(s), and (2.5)(u) as follows:
24-75-302. Capital construction fund - capital assessment fees -
calculation - information technology capital account - repeal.
(2) The controller shall transfer a sum as specified in this subsection
(2) from the general fund to the capital construction fund as money becomes
available in the general fund during the fiscal year beginning on July 1 of
the fiscal year in which the transfer is made or on the date otherwise
specified for the transfer. Transfers between funds pursuant to this
subsection (2) are not appropriations subject to the limitations of section
24-75-201.1. The amounts transferred pursuant to this subsection (2) are as
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

follows:
(uu) On July 1, 2024, one hundred sixty-two million seven hundred
seventy-eight thousand two hundred eighty-five dollars; and
(vv) On July 1, 2025, one hundred twenty-nine million four hundred
ninety-eight thousand thirty-three dollars; AND
(ww) ON JULY 1, 2026, ONE HUNDRED THIRTY-ONE MILLION FIVE
HUNDRED FOURTEEN THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED FIFTY-FIVE DOLLARS.
(2.3) In addition to the sums transferred pursuant to subsections (2)
and (2.5) of this section, the state treasurer and the controller shall transfer
a sum as specified in this subsection (2.3) from the general fund to the
information technology capital account created in subsection (3.7) of this
section as money becomes available in the general fund during the fiscal
year beginning on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the transfer is made or
on April 1 of the fiscal year if otherwise specified. Transfers between funds
pursuant to this subsection (2.3) are not appropriations subject to the
limitations of section 24-75-201.1. The amounts transferred pursuant to this
subsection (2.3) are as follows:
(p) On July 1, 2024, seventy million eight hundred eleven thousand
three hundred thirty-four dollars; and
(q) On July 1, 2025, twenty million five hundred fifty-seven
thousand four hundred thirty-three dollars; AND
(s) ON JULY 1, 2026, THREE MILLION FOUR HUNDRED TWENTY
THOUSAND NINE HUNDRED FORTY-THREE DOLLARS.
(2.5) In addition to the sums transferred pursuant to subsections (2)
and (2.3) of this section, the state treasurer and the controller shall transfer
a sum as specified in this subsection (2.5) from the general fund exempt
account of the general fund created pursuant to section 24-77-103.6 to the
capital construction fund as money becomes available in the general fund
exempt account during the fiscal year beginning on July 1 of the fiscal year
in which the transfer is made. Transfers between funds pursuant to this
subsection (2.5) are not appropriations subject to the limitations of section
24-75-201.1. The amounts transferred pursuant to this subsection (2.5) are
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1402

as follows:
(s) On July 1, 2024, five hundred thousand dollars; and
(t) On July 1, 2025, five hundred thousand dollars; AND
(u) ON JULY 1, 2026, FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-129, add (5) as
follows:
25-7-129. Disposition of fines - community impact cash fund -
repeal.
(5) (a) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
ONE MILLION SEVEN HUNDRED FORTY-EIGHT THOUSAND EIGHT HUNDRED
SIXTY-THREE DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
CAPITAL ACCOUNT CREATED IN SECTION 24-75-302 (3.7).
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-235, add (7) as
follows:
42-4-235. Minimum standards for commercial vehicles - motor
carrier safety fund - created - definitions - rules - penalties - repeal.
(7) (a) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FIVE HUNDRED EIGHTY-SEVEN THOUSAND, THREE HUNDRED EIGHTEEN
DOLLARS FROM THE MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY FUND TO THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY CAPITAL ACCOUNT CREATED IN SECTION 24-75-302 (3.7), TO
BE USED FOR A RECORDS UTILIZATION UPGRADE FOR THE COLORADO STATE
PATROL.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-5-504, add (5) as
follows:
43-5-504. Motorcycle operator safety training fund - gifts,
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1402

donations, and grants - tuition benefit - rules - definitions - repeal.
(5) (a) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
ONE MILLION NINE HUNDRED SEVENTY-SIX THOUSAND SEVEN HUNDRED
EIGHTY-TWO DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
CAPITAL ACCOUNT CREATED IN SECTION 24-75-302 (3.7), TO BE USED FOR A
RECORDS UTILIZATION UPGRADE FOR THE COLORADO STATE PATROL.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1402

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1402